District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.85

Attorney General salary.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Attorney General for the District of Columbia shall be paid at an annual rate equal to the rate of basic pay for level E5 on the Executive Schedule pursuant to § 1-610.52.

(b)

An Attorney General for the District of Columbia elected under § 1-204.35 shall receive compensation equal to the Chairman of the Council of the District of Columbia as provided in § 1-204.03(d).

History

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-160, § 105, 57 DCR 3012